Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.340

Labeling requirements.

(1) Any packaged commercial fertilizer distributed in this state that is not a customer-formula fertilizer must have placed on or affixed to the package a label stating in clearly legible and conspicuous form the following information:

(a) The net weight;

(b) The product name, brand, and grade. The grade is not required if no primary nutrients are claimed;

(c) The guaranteed analysis;

(d) The name and address of the registrant or licensee. The name and address of the manufacturer, if different from the registrant or licensee, may also be stated;

(e) Any information required under WAC 296-307-560 through 296-307-56050;

(f) A statement, established by rule, referring persons to the department's Uniform Resource Locator (URL) internet address where data regarding the metals content of the product is located; and

(g) Other information as required by the department by rule.

(2) Any commercial fertilizer that is distributed in bulk in this state that is not a customer-formula fertilizer must be accompanied by a written or printed statement that includes the information required by subsection (1) of this section and must be supplied to the purchaser at the time of delivery.

(3) Each delivery of a customer-formula fertilizer in this state must be accompanied by either a statement, invoice, a delivery slip, or a label if bagged, containing the following information: The net weight; the brand; the name and amount of each ingredient; the guaranteed analysis which may be stated to the nearest tenth of a percent or to the next lower whole number; the name and address of the registrant or licensee, or manufacturer, or both; and the name and address of the purchaser.

(4) Each delivery of a customer-formula fertilizer must contain the ingredients specified by the purchaser. A record of the invoice or statement of each delivery must be kept by the registrant or licensee for twelve months and must be available to the department upon request.

[ 2008 c 292 s 2; 2003 c 15 s 1; 1999 c 381 s 1; 1998 c 36 s 6; 1993 c 183 s 5; 1987 c 45 s 12; 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 15 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2004." [ 2003 c 15 s 2.]

Effective date—1999 c 381: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999." [ 1999 c 381 s 2.]

Short title—1998 c 36: See note following RCW 15.54.265.

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.